Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.450

General obligation bonds—Issuance, sale, form, term, election, payment.

Notwithstanding the limitations of chapter 39.36 RCW and any other statutory limitations otherwise applicable and limiting municipal debt, a metropolitan municipal corporation shall have the power to contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds and to pledge the full faith and credit of the corporation to the payment thereof, for any authorized capital purpose of the metropolitan municipal corporation, not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding nonvoter approved general indebtedness, equal to three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the metropolitan municipal corporation, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A metropolitan municipal corporation may additionally contract indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds, for any authorized capital purpose of a metropolitan municipal corporation, together with any other outstanding general indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to five percent of the value of the taxable property within the corporation, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when a proposition authorizing the indebtedness has been approved by three-fifths of the persons voting on said proposition at said election at which such election the total number of persons voting on such bond proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of voters voting within the area of said metropolitan municipal corporation at the last preceding state general election. Such general obligation bonds may be authorized in any total amount in one or more propositions and the amount of such authorization may exceed the amount of bonds which could then lawfully be issued. Such bonds may be issued in one or more series from time to time out of such authorization. The elections shall be held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050.

Whenever the voters of a metropolitan municipal corporation have, pursuant to RCW 84.52.056, approved excess property tax levies to retire such bond issues, both the principal of and interest on such general obligation bonds may be made payable from annual tax levies to be made upon all the taxable property within the metropolitan municipal corporation in excess of the constitutional and/or statutory tax limit. The principal of and interest on any general obligation bond may be made payable from any other taxes or any special assessments which the metropolitan municipal corporation may be authorized to levy or from any otherwise unpledged revenue which may be derived from the ownership or operation of properties or facilities incident to the performance of the authorized function for which such bonds are issued or may be made payable from any combination of the foregoing sources. The metropolitan council may include in the principal amount of such bond issue an amount for engineering, architectural, planning, financial, legal, urban design and other services incident to acquisition or construction solely for authorized capital purposes.

General obligation bonds shall be issued and sold by the metropolitan council as provided in chapter 39.46 RCW and shall mature in not to exceed forty years from the date of issue.

[ 1993 c 240 s 13; 1984 c 186 s 18; 1983 c 167 s 47; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 24; 1971 ex.s. c 303 s 9; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 38; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 13; 1970 ex.s. c 11 s 1. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 255 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 16; 1967 c 105 s 13; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.450; prior: 1957 c 213 s 45.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.

Limitations upon indebtedness: State Constitution Art. 7 s 2 (Amendments 55, 59), Art. 8 s 6 (Amendment 27), chapter 39.36 RCW, RCW 84.52.050.